test/src/gt-norm-yamls/verbLiehket_gt-norm.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# The auxiliaries liehket, årråt and ij,  from lexicon LIEHKET, ÅRROT, NEG

Tests:

  Verb - liehket: # LIEHKET
    liehket+V+IV+Inf: liehket
    liehket+V+IV+Sup: []
    liehket+V+IV+PrfPrc: [læhkám, lähkám]
    liehket+V+IV+Ger: []
    liehket+V+IV+Actio+Ess: liehkemin
    liehket+V+IV+Actio+Ela: liehkemis
    liehket+V+IV+VAbess: []
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lav
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: la
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: lihpit
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: li
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: lidjiv
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: lidji
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: lij
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: lijma
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: lijda
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: lidjin
    liehket+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: liege
    liehket+V+IV+Imprt+Pl1: [læhkop, lähkop]
    liehket+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: liehkit
    liehket+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: liehkisa
    liehket+V+IV+ImprtII+Du2: lehkuda
    liehket+V+IV+ImprtII+Du3: lehkuska
    liehket+V+IV+Pot+Sg1: littjav
    liehket+V+IV+Pot+Sg2: littja
    liehket+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: [lisj, lesj]
    liehket+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: littji
    liehket+V+IV+Cond+Sg1: luluv
    liehket+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: lulu
    liehket+V+IV+Cond+Du2: lulujda
    liehket+V+IV+Cond+Pl3: lulun
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1+SentInit: lev
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2+SentInit: le
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2+SentInit: lehpit
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3+SentInit: le
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1+SentInit: ledjiv
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2+SentInit: ledji
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3+SentInit: lej
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1+SentInit: lejma
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2+SentInit: lejda
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3+SentInit: ledjin
    liehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3+Clt: l
